Hawaii statutes.
§712-1253 Penalties under other laws.
Any penalty imposed for violation of this chapter or chapter 329 is in addition
to, and not in lieu of, any civil or administrative penalty or sanction
otherwise authorized by law. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 176, §9]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next